Mississippi, session 2026, HB1933.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 3393100000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds previously appropriated for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; and HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $ 75,039,361.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions that had been authorized by the Legislature in prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 3390200000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1603, 2022 Regular Session; HB 1391, 2021 Regular Session; HB 1705, 2020 Regular Session; HB 1666, 2019 Regular Session; HB 1616, 2018 Regular Session; SB 3015, 2017 Regular Session; SB 2911, 2016 Regular Session; SB 2902, 2014 Regular Session; and SB 2896, 2013 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027..... .............................................. $ 264,552.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in prior fiscal years for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 3.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 3390300000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1603, 2022 Regular Session; HB 1391, 2021 Regular Session; HB 1705, 2020 Regular Session; HB 1666, 2019 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $  70,000,000.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in prior fiscal years for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at the Institutions of Higher Learning and Community and Junior Colleges and various state agencies and institutions. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 4.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 3391100000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session, and SB 3045, 2022 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................. .............................................. $ 22,940,947.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature for the Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of Building in the prior fiscal year for construction and/or repair, renovation, and improvement of state-owned properties, universities, and community colleges. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 5.   The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 3391200000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; and SB 3045, 2022 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................. .............................................. $ 4,142,808.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature for the Department of Finance and Administration, Bureau of Building in the prior fiscal year for construction and/or repair, renovation, and improvement of state-owned properties, universities, and community colleges. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 6.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6493C00000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1603, 2022 Regular Session; HB 1391, 2021 Regular Session; HB 1705, 2020 Regular Session; HB 1666, 2019 Regular Session; HB 1616, 2018 Regular Session; and SB 3015, 2017 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.......... $     241,974.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in prior fiscal years for upgrades and renovation of the water treatment facility at the Alcorn State University and related purposes. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under the provisions of this section, in no event shall the amount expended exceed the unexpended balance as of June 30, 2026, or change the purpose of which the funds were originally authorized.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 7.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6493200000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1603, 2022 Regular Session; HB 1391, 2021 Regular Session; HB 1705, 2020 Regular Session; and HB 1667, 2019 Regular Session for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $      16,817.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in the prior fiscal year for improvements for the Law Enforcement Officers Training Academy. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 8.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6493300000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1603, 2022 Regular Session; HB 1391, 2021 Regular Session; HB 1705, 2020 Regular Session; and SB 3049, 2019 Regular Session for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.. $   304,288.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds for construction and/or repair, renovation, and improvements of state-owned properties, universities and community colleges that had been authorized by the Legislature in a prior fiscal year. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 9.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6493500000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1603, 2022 Regular Session; and SB 2948, 2021 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.... $   340,222.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in the prior fiscal year for repair, renovation, and improvements of state-owned properties, universities and community colleges. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 10.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6493600000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1603, 2022 Regular Session; and SB 2948, 2021 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.... $ 9,067,871.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in the prior fiscal year for repair, renovation, and improvements of state-owned properties, universities and community colleges. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 11.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6493700000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1603, 2022 Regular Session; and HB 1550, 2022 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.... $  8,253,553.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in the prior fiscal year for construction, repair, renovation, and improvements of state-owned properties, universities and community colleges. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 12.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6494300000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; and SB 3045, 2022 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................. .............................................. $ 324,138.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in the prior fiscal year for repair, renovation, and improvements of state-owned properties, universities and community colleges. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 13.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6494500000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds previously appropriated for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; and SB 3043, 2023 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $ 1,911,936.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions that had been authorized by the Legislature in prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 14.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6494600000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds previously appropriated for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session and SB 3054, 2024 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................................. ............................................... $ 6,955,144.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions that had been authorized by the Legislature in prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 15.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6494700000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds previously appropriated for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session and SB 3054, 2024 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................................. ............................................... $ 2,577,442.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions that had been authorized by the Legislature in prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 16.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6611300000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; SB 2468, 2024 Regular Session; HB 603, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; and HB 1353, 2022 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................... ............................................. $ 92,298,552.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in the prior fiscal year for repair, renovation, and improvements of  state-owned properties, universities and community colleges. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 17.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6611310000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; SB 2468, 2024 Regular Session; HB 603, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; and HB 1353, 2022 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................... .............................................. $ 12,364,825.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in the prior fiscal year for repair, renovation, and improvements of state-owned properties, universities and community colleges. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 18.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6611320000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; SB 2468, 2024 Regular Session; HB 603, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1353, 2022 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................................. .............................................. $ 46,427,048.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in the prior fiscal year for repair, renovation, and improvements of state-owned properties, universities and community colleges. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 19.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6611330000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; SB 2468, 2024 Regular Session; HB 603, 2023 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session; and HB 1353, 2022 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................... .............................................. $ 204,331,969.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in the prior fiscal year for repair, renovation, and improvements of state-owned properties, universities and community colleges. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 20.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6611340000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1643, 2023 Regular Session, and HB 1353, 2022 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................. .............................................. $ 239,280.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds previously appropriated by the Legislature in the prior fiscal year for repair, renovation, and improvements of  state-owned properties, universities and community colleges. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 21.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6611360000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds previously appropriated for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; SB 3054, 2024 Regular Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; and HB 603, 2023 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................................... .............................................. $ 3,791,970.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions that had been authorized by the Legislature in prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 22.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6611400000 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds previously appropriated for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session and SB 2468, 2024 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................................. ............................................... $ 2,523,912.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds for construction and/or repair and renovation projects at various state agencies and institutions that had been authorized by the Legislature in prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 23.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 6822113000, 6822113100, and 6822113200 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds previously appropriated for construction, repair and renovation projects, and any other eligible expenses in connection with the Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) as allowable under Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (ARPA) or any guidance or regulation issued by the United States Department of the Treasury in conformity therewith at various state agencies and institutions, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; SB 3058, 2024 Regular Session; SB 3164, 2024 Regular Session; SB 3118, 2023 Regular Session; SB 3052, 2023 Regular Session; and SB 3062, 2022 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.......................... ............................................. $ 34,587,822.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds for construction, repair and renovation projects, and any other eligible expenses in connection with the Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) as allowable under Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (ARPA) or any guidance or regulation issued by the United States Department of the Treasury in conformity therewith at the Department of Public Safety and the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency that had been authorized by the Legislature in prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 24.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of Fund No. 3822113300 and Fund No. 3822113500 to the Department of Finance and Administration, acting through the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management, for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of funds previously appropriated for construction, repair and renovation projects, and any other eligible expenses in connection with the Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) as allowable under Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (ARPA) or any guidance or regulation issued by the United States Department of the Treasury in conformity therewith at various state agencies and institutions, as authorized in HB 40, 2025 First Extraordinary Session; HB 1816, 2024 Regular Session; SB 3058, 2024 Regular Session; SB 3164, 2024 Regular Session; SB 3052, 2023 Regular Session; SB 3014, 2022 Regular Session; SB 3018, 2022 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027  $  42,916,982.00. This reappropriation is made for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Special Funds for construction, repair and renovation projects, and any other eligible expenses in connection with the Coronavirus Disease 2019 (COVID-19) as allowable under Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (ARPA) or any guidance or regulation issued by the United States Department of the Treasury in conformity therewith at the Department of Public Safety and the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency that had been authorized by the Legislature in prior fiscal years. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2026, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 25.  The Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Office of General Services is expressly authorized and empowered to receive, budget and expend any state, local or other source funds designated for supplemental funding of construction and/or repair and renovation projects. SECTION 26.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 27.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.